src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/mrj1933-test-V-lydash_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - лыдам: # Verb-am '??'
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg1: лыдам
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg3: лыдат
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Sg3: лыдэш
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl1: лыдына
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl3: лыдыда
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl3: лыдыт
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+ConNeg: лыт
     лыдам+V+Ind+NonPst+Pl3+ConNeg: лытэп
#
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: лыдым
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: лыдыц
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: лыды
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: лытна
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: лытта
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: лыдэвӹ
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: лыт
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: лытэп
#
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: лыдынам
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: лыдынат
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: лыдын
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: лыдынна
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: лыдында
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: лыдыныт

##
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg1: лыдылдалынам
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg3: лыдылдалынат
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Sg3: лыдылдалын
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl1: лыдылдалынна
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3: лыдылдалында
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3: лыдылдалыныт
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+ConNeg: лыдылдал
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+NonPst+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдыдалэп

     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg1: лыдылдальым
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg3: лыдылдальыц
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Sg3: лыдылдальы
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl1: лыдылдална
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3: лыдылдалда
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3: лыдылдальэвӹ
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+ConNeg: лыдылдал
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: лыдыдалэп
#
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg1: лыдылдалынам
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалынат
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалын
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl1: лыдылдалынна
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалында
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалыныт
#
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg1: лыдылдалам
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалат
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Sg3: лыдылдалэш
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl1: лыдылдалына
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалыда
     лыдам+V+Ind+Ildal1+Prt2+Pl3: лыдылдалыт
##
     лыдам+V+Imprt+Sg3: лыт
     лыдам+V+Imprt+Sg3: лытшы
     лыдам+V+Imprt+Pl3: лытта
     лыдам+V+Imprt+Pl3: лыдышты
##
     лыдам+V+Imprt1+Sg2: лыдыма
     лыдам+V+Imprt1+Pl2: лыдымада
##
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2: лыдылдалма
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3: лыдылдалжы
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2: лыдылдалда
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3: лыдыдладышты

##
     лыдам+V+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: лыдымайӓ
     лыдам+V+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: лыдымадайӓ
##
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg2+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалмайӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Sg3+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалжыйӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl2+Foc/йӓ: лыдылдалдайӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Imprt1+Pl3+Foc/йӓ: лыдыдладыштыйӓ

##
     лыдам+V+Des+Sg1: лытнэм
     лыдам+V+Des+Sg3: лытнэт
     лыдам+V+Des+Sg3: лытнэжӹ
     лыдам+V+Des+Pl1: лытнэнӓ
     лыдам+V+Des+Pl3: лытнэдӓ
     лыдам+V+Des+Pl3: лытнэштӹ
##
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Sg1: лыдыдалнэм
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Sg3: лыдыдалнэт
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Sg3: лыдыдалнэжӹ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Pl1: лыдыдалнэнӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Pl3: лыдыдалнэдӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Des+Pl3: лыдыдалнэштӹ

##
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: лыттэлам
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: лыттэлат
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: лыттэ
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: лыттэлна
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: лыттэлда
     лыдам+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: лыттэлыт

#
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: лыдылдалтэлӓм
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: лыдылдалтэлӓт
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: лыдылдалтэ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: лыдылдалтэлнӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: лыдылдалтэлдӓ
     лыдам+V+Idal+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: лыдылдалтэлӹт
